Utah statutes.
11-17-18.   Powers of Governor's Office of Economic Development.

For purposes of this chapter and for the purposes of the Utah Interlocal Cooperation Act, the Governor's Office of Economic Development has all the powers set out in this chapter of, and is subject to the same limitations as, a municipality as though the office were defined as a municipality for purposes of this chapter, but it shall have such powers with respect to economic development or new venture investment fund projects only.  It is not authorized to exercise such powers in any manner which will create general obligations of the state or any agency, department, division, or political subdivision thereof.



Amended by Chapter 148, 2005 General Session

